Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1402
Purposes; rules of construction.

(1) The Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(2) Underlying purposes and policies of the act are:

(a) To simplify, clarify, modernize, and revise the law governing the rental of dwelling units and the rights and obligations of landlord and tenant;

(b) To encourage landlord and tenant to maintain and improve the quality of housing; and

(c) To make uniform the law among those states which enact it.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 1.